District of Columbia statutes.
2-301.05a

Repealed

Criteria for Council review of multiyear contracts and contracts in excess of $1 million.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 105a
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-257, § 3, 38 DCR 969
July 28, 1992, D.C. Law 9-136, § 2, 39 DCR 4083
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 3, 41 DCR 5193
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-265, § 2, 46 DCR 2096
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 102, 46 DCR 6373
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 120, 47 DCR 520
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 102, 47 DCR 6308
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 2302, 48 DCR 6981
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 3504, 49 DCR 6968
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 2202, 49 DCR 11664
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 130(a), 52 DCR 10637
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 119(a), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, §§ 1091, 1191, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 1152, 57 DCR 6242
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Short title: Section 1090 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle J of title I of the act may be cited as the “Criteria for Council Review of Contract Options Clarification Amendment Act of 2009”.

Short title: Section 1190 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle T of title I of the act may be cited as the “Transportation Procurement Practices Amendment Act of 2009”.

Short title: Section 1151 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle P of title I of the act may be cited as the “Transportation Procurement Practices Amendment Act of 2010”.

Sections 2 and 5 of D.C. Law 17-290 provided:

“Sec. 2. The Mayor transmitted to the Council a request for Council approval of a proposed lease agreement (’Lease’) by which, subject to certain conditions contained in the Lease, the District will lease a portion of the Benning-Stoddert Recreation Center property, consisting of Lot 807, Square 5407, and portions of Lots 802, 803, 812, and 25, Square 5402, as further defined in Exhibit A to the Lease (’Property’), for a term of 70 years (including option years) to the Washington Tennis & Education Foundation, a District of Columbia nonprofit corporation, to be used for recreational purposes.”

“Sec. 5. The Lease and the Memorandum of Agreement shall be exempt from the District of Columbia Procurement Practices Act of 1985, effective February 21, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-85; D.C. Official Code § 2-301.01 et seq.).”

Resolution 14-86, the “Contract with Greater Southeast Community Hospital to Establish the D.C. Healthcare Alliance Disapproval Emergency Resolution of 2001”, was approved effective April 27, 2001.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1152 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1302 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1302 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1091, 1191 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1091, 1191 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1031 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) amendment, see § 2 of Chief Financial Officer Approval of Payment of Goods and Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-519, September 30, 2008, 55 DCR 11009).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Council Review Extension Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-514, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8981).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2202 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2202 of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2202 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3404 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2102 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 46 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 102 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 102 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Chief Technology Officer Year 2000 Remediation Procurement Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-106, July 9, 1999, 46 DCR 6028).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Advisory Neighborhood Commission Procurement Exclusion Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-47, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 5481).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Chief Technology Officer Year 2000 Remediation Procurement Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-38, March 22, 1999, 46 DCR 3015).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Chief Technology Officer Year 2000 Remediation Procurement Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-38, March 22, 1999, 46 DCR 3015).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Establishment of Council Contract Review Criteria Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-214, December 16, 1997, 44 DCR 1), and see § 2 of the Establishment of Council Contract Review Criteria Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-305, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 2277).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Council Contract Approval Modification Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 Congressional Adjournment Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-7, March 3, 1997, 44 DCR 1621).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of the District Settlement Payment Integrity Temporary Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-277, December 7, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 12021).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 1302 of the Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Temporary Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-222, September 24, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 9859).
For temporary (225 day) additions, see §§ 2 and 3 of the Unauthorized Contract Stop Payment Temporary Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-139, March 23, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 3378).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Chief Financial Officer Approval of Payment of Goods and Services Temporary Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Law 17-282, December 24, 2008, law notification 56 DCR 891).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Establishment of Council Contract Review Criteria Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-78, March 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2113).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Council Contract Approval Modification Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-190, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2385).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Council Contract Approval Modification Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-88, February 13, 1996, law notification 43 DCR 1314).
1981 Ed., § 1-1181.5a.